app/knowledge_base/resources/dictionary.aff
SFX V3 Y 67
SFX V3 0 da b
SFX V3 0 di b
SFX V3 0 dani b
SFX V3 0 de b
SFX V3 0 du b
SFX V3 0 sisa b
SFX V3 0 sisan b
SFX V3 0 sise b
SFX V3 0 siste b
SFX V3 0 sisna b
SFX V3 0 sistu b
SFX V3 0 sisne b
SFX V3 0 a b
SFX V3 0 achuu b
SFX V3 0 achuuf b
SFX V3 0 adha b
SFX V3 0 adhe b
SFX V3 0 adhu b
SFX V3 0 ama b
SFX V3 0 amaa b
SFX V3 0 aman b
SFX V3 0 amne b
SFX V3 0 amoo b
SFX V3 0 amta b
SFX V3 0 amtan b
SFX V3 0 amte b
SFX V3 0 amti b
SFX V3 0 amtu b
SFX V3 0 amuuf b
SFX V3 0 ani b
SFX V3 0 e b
SFX V3 0 eera b
SFX V3 0 i b
SFX V3 0 uu b
SFX V3 0 uuf b
SFX V3 0 neerra b
SFX V3 0 aaf b
SFX V3 0 aas b
SFX V3 0 aatu b
SFX V3 0 uuttan b
SFX V3 0 uutti b
SFX V3 0 aa b
SFX V3 0 naan b
SFX V3 0 u b
SFX V3 0 eeti b
SFX V3 0 ees b
SFX V3 0 is b
SFX V3 0 uufan b
SFX V3 0 uufi b
SFX V3 0 uufii b
SFX V3 0 adhuu b
SFX V3 0 adhe b
SFX V3 0 amani b
SFX V3 0 ame b
SFX V3 0 amni b
SFX V3 0 amu b
SFX V3 0 amtu b
SFX V3 0 amtani b
SFX V3 0 amuu b
SFX V3 0 amuudha b
SFX V3 0 amuudhaaf b
SFX V3 0 amuun b
SFX V3 0 ullee b
SFX V3 0 aatii b
SFX V3 0 umsa b
SFX V3 0 iisa b
SFX V3 0 iinsa b


SFX V4 Y 83
SFX V4 t nna t
SFX V4 t nne t
SFX V4 t nnu t
SFX V4 t dha t
SFX V4 t dhe t
SFX V4 t dhu t
SFX V4 t chisiise t
SFX V4 t chisiisa t
SFX V4 t chisisa t
SFX V4 t chisiisan t
SFX V4 t chisiste t
SFX V4 t chisisna t
SFX V4 t chisistan t
SFX V4 t chiise t
SFX V4 t chiisan t
SFX V4 t chiisna t
SFX V4 t chiistan t
SFX V4 t chiisne t
SFX V4 t iinsa t
SFX V4 t iisa t
SFX V4 t nnoo t
SFX V4 0 ta t
SFX V4 0 tani t
SFX V4 0 taniittu t
SFX V4 0 te t
SFX V4 0 teetta t
SFX V4 0 ti t
SFX V4 0 tu t
SFX V4 0 tuu t
SFX V4 0 a t
SFX V4 0 achuu 
SFX V4 t chuu t
SFX V4 0 achuuf t
SFX V4 0 adha t
SFX V4 0 adhe t
SFX V4 0 adhu t
SFX V4 0 ama t
SFX V4 0 amaa t
SFX V4 0 aman t
SFX V4 0 amne t
SFX V4 0 amoo t
SFX V4 0 amta t
SFX V4 0 amtan t
SFX V4 0 amte t
SFX V4 0 amti t
SFX V4 0 amtu t
SFX V4 0 amuuf t
SFX V4 0 ani t
SFX V4 0 e t
SFX V4 0 eera t
SFX V4 0 i t
SFX V4 0 uu t
SFX V4 0 uuf t
SFX V4 0 neerra t
SFX V4 0 aaf t
SFX V4 0 aas t
SFX V4 0 aatu t
SFX V4 0 uuttan t
SFX V4 0 uutti t
SFX V4 0 aa t
SFX V4 0 naan t
SFX V4 0 u t
SFX V4 0 eeti t
SFX V4 0 ees t
SFX V4 0 is t
SFX V4 0 uufan t
SFX V4 0 uufi t
SFX V4 0 uufii t
SFX V4 0 adhuu t
SFX V4 0 adhe t
SFX V4 0 amani t
SFX V4 0 ame t
SFX V4 0 amni t
SFX V4 0 amu t
SFX V4 0 amtu t
SFX V4 0 amtani t
SFX V4 0 amuu t
SFX V4 0 amuudha t
SFX V4 0 amuudhaaf t
SFX V4 0 amuun t
SFX V4 0 ullee t
SFX V4 0 aatii t
SFX V4 0 umsa t
SFX V4 0 iisa t
SFX V4 0 iinsa t

SFX V5 Y 77
SFX V5 0 ita s
SFX V5 0 iti s
SFX V5 0 itani s
SFX V5 0 ite s
SFX V5 0 itu s
SFX V5 0 ina s
SFX V5 0 inu s
SFX V5 0 ine s
SFX V5 0 ise s
SFX V5 0 isa s
SFX V5 0 isan s
SFX V5 0 iste s
SFX V5 0 isna s
SFX V5 0 ifte s
SFX V5 0 ifna s
SFX V5 0 isise s
SFX V5 0 isisa s
SFX V5 0 isisan s
SFX V5 0 isiste s
SFX V5 0 isisna s
SFX V5 0 isista s
SFX V5 0 isistan s
SFX V5 0 a s
SFX V5 0 achuu s
SFX V5 0 achuuf s
SFX V5 0 adha s
SFX V5 0 adhe s
SFX V5 0 adhu s
SFX V5 0 ama s
SFX V5 0 amaa s
SFX V5 0 aman s
SFX V5 0 amne s
SFX V5 0 amoo s
SFX V5 0 amta s
SFX V5 0 amtan s
SFX V5 0 amte s
SFX V5 0 amti s
SFX V5 0 amtu s
SFX V5 0 amuuf s
SFX V5 0 ani s
SFX V5 0 e s
SFX V5 0 eera s
SFX V5 0 i s
SFX V5 0 uu s
SFX V5 0 uuf s
SFX V5 0 neerra s
SFX V5 0 aaf s
SFX V5 0 aas s
SFX V5 0 aatu s
SFX V5 0 uuttan s
SFX V5 0 uutti s
SFX V5 0 aa s
SFX V5 0 naan s
SFX V5 0 u s
SFX V5 0 eeti s
SFX V5 0 ees s
SFX V5 0 is s
SFX V5 0 uufan s
SFX V5 0 uufi s
SFX V5 0 uufii s
SFX V5 0 adhuu s
SFX V5 0 adhe s
SFX V5 0 amani s
SFX V5 0 ame s
SFX V5 0 amni s
SFX V5 0 amu s
SFX V5 0 amtu s
SFX V5 0 amtani s
SFX V5 0 amuu s
SFX V5 0 amuudha s
SFX V5 0 amuudhaaf s
SFX V5 0 amuun s
SFX V5 0 ullee s
SFX V5 0 aatii s
SFX V5 0 umsa s
SFX V5 0 iisa s
SFX V5 0 iinsa s


SFX V5 Y 77
SFX V5 0 ita ch
SFX V5 0 iti ch
SFX V5 0 itani ch
SFX V5 0 ite ch
SFX V5 0 itu ch
SFX V5 0 ina ch
SFX V5 0 inu ch
SFX V5 0 ine ch
SFX V5 0 ise ch
SFX V5 0 isa ch
SFX V5 0 isan ch
SFX V5 0 iste ch
SFX V5 0 isna ch
SFX V5 0 ifte ch
SFX V5 0 ifna ch
SFX V5 0 isise ch
SFX V5 0 isisa ch
SFX V5 0 isisan ch
SFX V5 0 isiste ch
SFX V5 0 isisna ch
SFX V5 0 isista ch
SFX V5 0 isistan ch
SFX V5 0 a ch
SFX V5 0 achuu ch
SFX V5 0 achuuf ch
SFX V5 0 adha ch
SFX V5 0 adhe ch
SFX V5 0 adhu ch
SFX V5 0 ama ch
SFX V5 0 amaa ch
SFX V5 0 aman ch
SFX V5 0 amne ch
SFX V5 0 amoo ch
SFX V5 0 amta ch
SFX V5 0 amtan ch
SFX V5 0 amte ch
SFX V5 0 amti ch
SFX V5 0 amtu ch
SFX V5 0 amuuf ch
SFX V5 0 ani ch
SFX V5 0 e ch
SFX V5 0 eera ch
SFX V5 0 i ch
SFX V5 0 uu ch
SFX V5 0 uuf ch
SFX V5 0 neerra ch
SFX V5 0 aaf ch
SFX V5 0 aas ch
SFX V5 0 aatu ch
SFX V5 0 uuttan ch
SFX V5 0 uutti ch
SFX V5 0 aa ch
SFX V5 0 naan ch
SFX V5 0 u ch
SFX V5 0 eeti ch
SFX V5 0 ees ch
SFX V5 0 is ch
SFX V5 0 uufan ch
SFX V5 0 uufi ch
SFX V5 0 uufii ch
SFX V5 0 adhuu ch
SFX V5 0 adhe ch
SFX V5 0 amani ch
SFX V5 0 ame ch
SFX V5 0 amni ch
SFX V5 0 amu ch
SFX V5 0 amtu ch
SFX V5 0 amtani ch
SFX V5 0 amuu ch
SFX V5 0 amuudha ch
SFX V5 0 amuudhaaf ch
SFX V5 0 amuun ch
SFX V5 0 ullee ch
SFX V5 0 aatii ch
SFX V5 0 umsa ch
SFX V5 0 iisa ch
SFX V5 0 iinsa ch


SFX V5 Y 77
SFX V5 0 ita c
SFX V5 0 iti c
SFX V5 0 itani c
SFX V5 0 ite c
SFX V5 0 itu c
SFX V5 0 ina c
SFX V5 0 inu c
SFX V5 0 ine c
SFX V5 0 ise c
SFX V5 0 isa c
SFX V5 0 isan c
SFX V5 0 iste c
SFX V5 0 isna c
SFX V5 0 ifte c
SFX V5 0 ifna c
SFX V5 0 isise c
SFX V5 0 isisa c
SFX V5 0 isisan c
SFX V5 0 isiste c
SFX V5 0 isisna c
SFX V5 0 isista c
SFX V5 0 isistan c
SFX V5 0 a c
SFX V5 0 achuu c
SFX V5 0 achuuf c
SFX V5 0 adha c
SFX V5 0 adhe c
SFX V5 0 adhu c
SFX V5 0 ama c
SFX V5 0 amaa c
SFX V5 0 aman c
SFX V5 0 amne c
SFX V5 0 amoo c
SFX V5 0 amta c
SFX V5 0 amtan c
SFX V5 0 amte c
SFX V5 0 amti c
SFX V5 0 amtu c
SFX V5 0 amuuf c
SFX V5 0 ani c
SFX V5 0 e c
SFX V5 0 eera c
SFX V5 0 i c
SFX V5 0 uu c
SFX V5 0 uuf c
SFX V5 0 neerra c
SFX V5 0 aaf c
SFX V5 0 aas c
SFX V5 0 aatu c
SFX V5 0 uuttan c
SFX V5 0 uutti c
SFX V5 0 aa c
SFX V5 0 naan c
SFX V5 0 u c
SFX V5 0 eeti c
SFX V5 0 ees c
SFX V5 0 is c
SFX V5 0 uufan c
SFX V5 0 uufi c
SFX V5 0 uufii c
SFX V5 0 adhuu c
SFX V5 0 adhe c
SFX V5 0 amani c
SFX V5 0 ame c
SFX V5 0 amni c
SFX V5 0 amu c
SFX V5 0 amtu c
SFX V5 0 amtani c
SFX V5 0 amuu c
SFX V5 0 amuudha c
SFX V5 0 amuudhaaf c
SFX V5 0 amuun c
SFX V5 0 ullee c
SFX V5 0 aatii c
SFX V5 0 umsa c
SFX V5 0 iisa c
SFX V5 0 iinsa c


SFX V6 Y 74
SFX V6 0 la l
SFX V6 0 lu l
SFX V6 0 le l
SFX V6 0 lani l
SFX V6 0 ta l
SFX V6 0 tani l
SFX V6 0 taniittu l
SFX V6 0 te l
SFX V6 0 teetta l
SFX V6 0 ti l
SFX V6 0 tu l
SFX V6 0 tuu l
SFX V6 0 sisa l
SFX V6 0 sisan l
SFX V6 0 sise l
SFX V6 0 siste l
SFX V6 0 sisna l
SFX V6 0 sistu l
SFX V6 0 sisne l
SFX V6 0 a l
SFX V6 0 achuu l
SFX V6 0 achuuf l
SFX V6 0 adha l
SFX V6 0 adhe l
SFX V6 0 adhu l
SFX V6 0 ama l
SFX V6 0 amaa l
SFX V6 0 aman l
SFX V6 0 amne l
SFX V6 0 amoo l
SFX V6 0 amta l
SFX V6 0 amtan l
SFX V6 0 amte l
SFX V6 0 amti l
SFX V6 0 amtu l
SFX V6 0 amuuf l
SFX V6 0 ani l
SFX V6 0 e l
SFX V6 0 eera l
SFX V6 0 i l
SFX V6 0 uu l
SFX V6 0 uuf l
SFX V6 0 neerra l
SFX V6 0 aaf l
SFX V6 0 aas l
SFX V6 0 aatu l
SFX V6 0 uuttan l
SFX V6 0 uutti l
SFX V6 0 aa l
SFX V6 0 naan l
SFX V6 0 u l
SFX V6 0 eeti l
SFX V6 0 ees l
SFX V6 0 is l
SFX V6 0 uufan l
SFX V6 0 uufi l
SFX V6 0 uufii l
SFX V6 0 adhuu l
SFX V6 0 adhe l
SFX V6 0 amani l
SFX V6 0 ame l
SFX V6 0 amni l
SFX V6 0 amu l
SFX V6 0 amtu l
SFX V6 0 amtani l
SFX V6 0 amuu l
SFX V6 0 amuudha l
SFX V6 0 amuudhaaf l
SFX V6 0 amuun l
SFX V6 0 ullee l
SFX V6 0 aatii l
SFX V6 0 umsa l
SFX V6 0 iisa l
SFX V6 0 iinsa l


SFX V7 Y 73
SFX V7 0 ra r
SFX V7 0 ru r
SFX V7 0 re r
SFX V7 0 ta r
SFX V7 0 tani r
SFX V7 0 taniittu r
SFX V7 0 te r
SFX V7 0 teetta r
SFX V7 0 ti r
SFX V7 0 tu r
SFX V7 0 tuu r
SFX V7 0 sisa r
SFX V7 0 sisan r
SFX V7 0 sise r
SFX V7 0 siste r
SFX V7 0 sisna r
SFX V7 0 sistu r
SFX V7 0 sisne r
SFX V7 0 a r
SFX V7 0 achuu r
SFX V7 0 achuuf r
SFX V7 0 adha r
SFX V7 0 adhe r
SFX V7 0 adhu r
SFX V7 0 ama r
SFX V7 0 amaa r
SFX V7 0 aman r
SFX V7 0 amne r
SFX V7 0 amoo r
SFX V7 0 amta r
SFX V7 0 amtan r
SFX V7 0 amte r
SFX V7 0 amti r
SFX V7 0 amtu r
SFX V7 0 amuuf r
SFX V7 0 ani r
SFX V7 0 e r
SFX V7 0 eera r
SFX V7 0 i r
SFX V7 0 uu r
SFX V7 0 uuf r
SFX V7 0 neerra r
SFX V7 0 aaf r
SFX V7 0 aas r
SFX V7 0 aatu r
SFX V7 0 uuttan r
SFX V7 0 uutti r
SFX V7 0 aa r
SFX V7 0 naan r
SFX V7 0 u r
SFX V7 0 eeti r
SFX V7 0 ees r
SFX V7 0 is r
SFX V7 0 uufan r
SFX V7 0 uufi r
SFX V7 0 uufii r
SFX V7 0 adhuu r
SFX V7 0 adhe r
SFX V7 0 amani r
SFX V7 0 ame r
SFX V7 0 amni r
SFX V7 0 amu r
SFX V7 0 amtu r
SFX V7 0 amtani r
SFX V7 0 amuu r
SFX V7 0 amuudha r
SFX V7 0 amuudhaaf r
SFX V7 0 amuun r
SFX V7 0 ullee r
SFX V7 0 aatii r
SFX V7 0 umsa r
SFX V7 0 iisa r
SFX V7 0 iinsa r

SFX V8 Y 67
SFX V8 0 xa ph
SFX V8 0 xi ph
SFX V8 0 xani ph
SFX V8 0 xe ph
SFX V8 0 xu ph
SFX V8 0 sisa ph
SFX V8 0 sisan ph
SFX V8 0 sise ph
SFX V8 0 siste ph
SFX V8 0 sisna ph
SFX V8 0 sistu ph
SFX V8 0 sisne ph
SFX V8 0 a ph
SFX V8 0 achuu ph
SFX V8 0 achuuf ph
SFX V8 0 adha ph
SFX V8 0 adhe ph
SFX V8 0 adhu ph
SFX V8 0 ama ph
SFX V8 0 amaa ph
SFX V8 0 aman ph
SFX V8 0 amne ph
SFX V8 0 amoo ph
SFX V8 0 amta ph
SFX V8 0 amtan ph
SFX V8 0 amte ph
SFX V8 0 amti ph
SFX V8 0 amtu ph
SFX V8 0 amuuf ph
SFX V8 0 ani ph
SFX V8 0 e ph
SFX V8 0 eera ph
SFX V8 0 i ph
SFX V8 0 uu ph
SFX V8 0 uuf ph
SFX V8 0 neerra ph
SFX V8 0 aaf ph
SFX V8 0 aas ph
SFX V8 0 aatu ph
SFX V8 0 uuttan ph
SFX V8 0 uutti ph
SFX V8 0 aa ph
SFX V8 0 naan ph
SFX V8 0 u ph
SFX V8 0 eeti ph
SFX V8 0 ees ph
SFX V8 0 is ph
SFX V8 0 uufan ph
SFX V8 0 uufi ph
SFX V8 0 uufii ph
SFX V8 0 adhuu ph
SFX V8 0 adhe ph
SFX V8 0 amani ph
SFX V8 0 ame ph
SFX V8 0 amni ph
SFX V8 0 amu ph
SFX V8 0 amtu ph
SFX V8 0 amtani ph
SFX V8 0 amuu ph
SFX V8 0 amuudha ph
SFX V8 0 amuudhaaf ph
SFX V8 0 amuun ph
SFX V8 0 ullee ph
SFX V8 0 aatii ph
SFX V8 0 umsa ph
SFX V8 0 iisa ph
SFX V8 0 iinsa ph

SFX V8 Y 67
SFX V8 0 xa x
SFX V8 0 xi x
SFX V8 0 xani x
SFX V8 0 xe x
SFX V8 0 xu x
SFX V8 0 sisa x
SFX V8 0 sisan x
SFX V8 0 sise x
SFX V8 0 siste x
SFX V8 0 sisna x
SFX V8 0 sistu x
SFX V8 0 sisne x
SFX V8 0 a x
SFX V8 0 achuu x
SFX V8 0 achuuf x
SFX V8 0 adha x
SFX V8 0 adhe x
SFX V8 0 adhu x
SFX V8 0 ama x
SFX V8 0 amaa x
SFX V8 0 aman x
SFX V8 0 amne x
SFX V8 0 amoo x
SFX V8 0 amta x
SFX V8 0 amtan x
SFX V8 0 amte x
SFX V8 0 amti x
SFX V8 0 amtu x
SFX V8 0 amuuf x
SFX V8 0 ani x
SFX V8 0 e x
SFX V8 0 eera x
SFX V8 0 i x
SFX V8 0 uu x
SFX V8 0 uuf x
SFX V8 0 neerra x
SFX V8 0 aaf x
SFX V8 0 aas x
SFX V8 0 aatu x
SFX V8 0 uuttan x
SFX V8 0 uutti x
SFX V8 0 aa x
SFX V8 0 naan x
SFX V8 0 u x
SFX V8 0 eeti x
SFX V8 0 ees x
SFX V8 0 is x
SFX V8 0 uufan x
SFX V8 0 uufi x
SFX V8 0 uufii x
SFX V8 0 adhuu x
SFX V8 0 adhe x
SFX V8 0 amani x
SFX V8 0 ame x
SFX V8 0 amni x
SFX V8 0 amu x
SFX V8 0 amtu x
SFX V8 0 amtani x
SFX V8 0 amuu x
SFX V8 0 amuudha x
SFX V8 0 amuudhaaf x
SFX V8 0 amuun x
SFX V8 0 ullee x
SFX V8 0 aatii x
SFX V8 0 umsa x
SFX V8 0 iisa x
SFX V8 0 iinsa x
